Maine, session 132, LD512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5204, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Secondary schools with 200 or fewer students. Notwithstanding any provision of
this section to the contrary, secondary students whose parents reside in a school
administrative unit with a secondary school with a total April 1st resident student count of
200 or fewer may enroll in another school administrative unit's secondary school in
accordance with this subsection.
A. The student's parents must notify the superintendent of the school administrative
unit where the student's parents reside of the intent to enroll in another secondary
school by April 1st.
B. The student's parents must provide the resident school administrative unit with an
acceptance letter from the receiving school by May 1st.
C. The receiving school administrative unit shall invoice the resident school
administrative unit on a quarterly basis for payment at the per-pupil rate, which may
not exceed the state maximum allowable tuition rate.